North Carolina statutes. Chapter 106. Agriculture.
Article 38. Marketing Cotton and Other Agricultural Commodities.

§§ 106-429.1 through 106-434.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 10.

§ 106-435.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 2.2(j), effective July 1, 2014.

History.

1919, c. 168, s. 5; 1921, c. 137, s. 5; Ex. Sess. 1921, c. 28; C.S., s. 4925(e); 1957, c. 1091; 1993, c. 561, s. 95(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, s. 26(a); 1997-261, s. 109; repealed by 2014-100, s. 2.2(j), effective July 1, 2014.

§§ 106-436 through 106-451.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-74, s. 11.

§§ 106-451.2 through 106-451.5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.